District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.23

Deposit of security — Adjudication of nonliability.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 127, ch. 222, § 23
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-423.
1973 Ed., § 40-439.